Washington statutes.
RCW 18.145.050

Powers of director.

In addition to any other authority provided by law, the director may:

(1) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW that are necessary to implement this chapter;

(2) Set all renewal, late renewal, duplicate, and verification fees in accordance with RCW 43.24.086;

(3) Establish the forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(4) Issue a certificate to any applicant who has met the requirements for certification;

(5) Hire clerical and administrative staff as needed to implement and administer this chapter;

(6) Maintain the official departmental record of all applicants and certificate holders;

(7) Approve the preparation and administration of examinations for certification;

(8) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of a failure of an examination;

(9) Set the criteria for meeting the standard required for certification;

(10) Establish continuing education requirements;

(11) Establish advisory committees whose membership shall include representatives of professional court reporting and stenomasking associations and representatives from accredited schools offering degrees in court reporting or stenomasking to advise the director on testing procedures, professional standards, disciplinary activities, or any other matters deemed necessary;

(12) Establish ad hoc advisory committees whose membership shall include representatives of professional court reporting and stenomasking associations and representatives from accredited schools offering degrees in court reporting or stenomasking to advise the director on testing procedures, professional standards, or any other matters deemed necessary.

[ 2010 c 49 s 1; 2002 c 86 s 243. Prior: 1995 c 269 s 502; 1995 c 27 s 6; 1989 c 382 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Effective date—Part headings not law—Severability—1995 c 269: See notes following RCW 18.16.050.